Hawaii statutes.
[§710-1016.8] Presumptions. Any person
other than a law enforcement officer, who wears the uniform or displays the
badge or identification card of a law enforcement officer, or who wears a
uniform or displays a badge or identification card resembling the uniform,
badge or identification card of a law enforcement officer, or a badge or
identification card purported to be a law enforcement officer's badge or
identification card, shall be presumed to be pretending to be a law enforcement
officer. [L 1987, c 130, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol14_Ch0701-0853
Next